Oklahoma, session 2026, SB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2251, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2251. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department
to be designated the “Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Department pursuant to the provisions of this act, monies
derived from the sale or conveyance of real property under the
jurisdiction of the Commission, and interest attributable to
investment of money in the fund. The revolving fund shall be a
continuing fund not subject to fiscal year limitations and shall be
under the administrative direction of the Department. Expenditures
from the fund created by this section shall be for the

administration, operation, and maintenance expenses of the
Department, for purchase of real property, and shall be made
pursuant to the laws of this state and the statutes relating to the
Department. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants
issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment the Oklahoma Tourism, Parks and
Recreation Enhancement Act. All monies accruing to the credit of
the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by
the Department for the administration, operation, and maintenance
expenses of the Department, for purchase of real property, and shall
be made pursuant to the laws of this state. Expenditures from the
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law, all interest and
income derived from deposits to the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department Revolving Fund shall be credited to the Oklahoma Tourism
and Recreation Department Revolving Fund.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2251.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department to be
designated the “Real Property Proceeds Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies derived from the sale, transfer,
lease, or other conveyance of real property under the jurisdiction
of the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Commission, except those
leases entered into pursuant to a concessionaire agreement. All
monies accruing to the fund are hereby appropriated and may be
expended by the Department for maintenance and capital projects
included on the annually updated five-year plan approved by the
Long-Range Capital Planning Commission pursuant to Section 188A of
Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes; provided, such monies shall not
be expended for compensation of any employee of a state agency. No
monies from the fund shall be transferred for any purpose to any
other state agency. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
ENR. S. B. NO. 248 Page 2

warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law, all interest and
income derived from deposits to the Real Property Proceeds Revolving
Fund shall be credited to the Real Property Proceeds Revolving Fund.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 248 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 248 Page 4